Hawaii statutes.
§107-28 County authority to amend and
adopt the Hawaii state building codes without council approval. (a) The
governing body of each county shall amend, adopt, and update the Hawaii state
building codes as they apply within their respective jurisdiction, in
accordance with section 46-1.5(13), without approval of the council. Each
county shall amend and adopt the Hawaii state building codes and standards
listed in section 107-25, as the referenced Hawaii state building codes and
standards for its respective county building code ordinance, no later than two
years after the adoption of the Hawaii state building codes.

(b) If a county does not amend the Hawaii
state building codes within the two-year time frame, the Hawaii state building
codes shall become applicable as an interim county building code. [L 2007, c 82, pt of §2; am L
2014, c 164, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next